Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-808
Corporate name; process; service upon city.

The corporate name of each city of the metropolitan class shall be The City of .................., and all process or notice whatever affecting any such city shall be served in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. VII, § 8, p. 511;

C.S.1922, § 3716;

C.S.1929, § 14-808;

R.S.1943, § 14-808;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 229.
July 21, 2022
Notice must be in writing and be served on mayor or acting mayor or in their absence from city, upon city clerk. Gordon v. City of Omaha, 77 Neb. 556, 110 N.W. 313 (1906).